Hawaii statutes.
[§169-1] Private agricultural parks. The
owners of one or more contiguous parcels, including public lands, within the
agricultural district may establish a private agricultural park. The owners
shall register the private agricultural park agreement with the department of
agriculture, on forms prescribed and prepared by the department, which shall
include the following information for each private agricultural park:

(1) The names and addresses of all the parties;

(2) The tax map parcel numbers and number of acres in
each parcel to be included in the private agricultural park;

(3) The types of agricultural activities and products
being produced or to be produced by each party, including non-agricultural
by-products that may include renewable sources of energy for the production of
electrical energy or liquid fuel and cold water for cooling, processing, and
air conditioning purposes; and

(4) Other information that the department of
agriculture determines may be of assistance in promoting the private agricultural
park;

provided that, by subsequent filings, a private
agricultural park may add or delete parties and parcels from its original
filing. [L 2009, c 122, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next